Florida, session 2026, SB112.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âVoter Protection 15 in Redistricting Act.â 16 Section 2.âSection 11.032, Florida Statutes, is created to 17 read: 18 11.032âReapportionment.âCongressional district boundaries 19 and state legislative district boundaries may be drawn only in 20 the second year after the most recent federal decennial 21 statewide census, during an extraordinary apportionment session 22 or judicial reapportionment in accordance with s. 16, Art. III 23 of the State Constitution, or according to federal law or court 24 order. 25 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.